Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) The department may issue confidential drivers' licenses and identicards to investigators employed by the office of the attorney general only for undercover or covert civil or criminal law enforcement activities.(b) Any driver's license or identicard issued under this subsection must display an expiration date that complies with the department's rules, but a driver's license or identicard issued under this subsection may be used only during the duration of the officer's assignment to an undercover or covert operation.(2) The director may adopt rules governing applications for, and the use of, confidential license plates, drivers' licenses, and identicards.--- END ---